Illinois, session 104th, SB3908.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Tax Deed Equity Fund. 8    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 9Sections 21-90, 21-215, 21-295, 21-305, 21-355, 22-40, 22-55, 1022-60, 22-65, and 22-80 and by adding Sections 22-100 and 1122-101 as follows: 12    (35 ILCS 200/21-90)13    Sec. 21-90. Purchase and sale by county; distribution of 14proceeds. 15    (a) When any property is offered for sale under any of the 16provisions of this Code, the county board of the county in 17which the property is located, in its discretion, may bid, or, 18in the case of forfeited property, may apply to purchase it or 19otherwise acquire the tax lien or certificate in the name of 20the county as trustee for all taxing districts having an 21interest in the property's taxes or special assessments for   SB3908- 2 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1the nonpayment of which the property is sold. The presiding 2officer of the county board, with the advice and consent of the 3board, may appoint on its behalf some officer, person, or 4entity to attend such sales, bid on tax liens or certificates, 5and act on behalf of the county when exercising its authority 6under this Section. The county shall apply on the bid or 7purchase the unpaid taxes and special assessments due upon the 8property. No cash need be paid for the unpaid taxes and special 9assessments due on the property for any purchase of 10forfeiture. The county shall pay all nonrefundable fees 11required under Section 22-100, 22-101, 22-40, 22-80. 12    (b) The county, as trustee for all taxing districts having 13an interest in the property's taxes or special assessments, 14shall be the designated holder of all tax liens or 15certificates that are forfeited to the State or county. No 16cash need be paid for the forfeited tax lien or certificate. 17    (c) For any tax lien or certificate acquired under 18subsection (a) or (b) of this Section, the county may take 19steps necessary to acquire title to the property and may 20manage and operate the property, including, but not limited 21to, mowing of grass, removal of nuisance greenery, removal of 22garbage, waste, debris or other materials, or the demolition, 23repair, or remediation of unsafe structures. When a county, or 24other taxing district within the county, is a petitioner for a 25tax deed, no filing fee shall be required. When a county or 26other taxing district within the county is the petitioner for   SB3908- 3 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1a tax deed, one petition may be filed including all parcels 2that are tax delinquent within the county or taxing district, 3and any publication made under Section 22-20 of this Code may 4combine all such parcels within a single notice. The notice 5may include the street address as listed on the most recent 6available tax bills, if available, and shall list the Property 7Index Number of the parcels for informational purposes. The 8county, as tax creditor and as trustee for other tax 9creditors, or other taxing district within the county, shall 10not be required to allege and prove that all taxes and special 11assessments which become due and payable after the sale or 12forfeiture to the county have been paid nor shall the county be 13required to pay the subsequently accruing taxes or special 14assessments at any time. The county board or its designee may 15prohibit the county collector from including the property in 16the tax sale of one or more subsequent years. The lien of taxes 17and special assessments which become due and payable after a 18sale to a county shall merge in the fee title of the county, or 19other taxing district within the county, on the issuance of a 20deed.21    The county may sell any property acquired with authority 22provided in this Section, or assign any tax certificate to any 23party, including, but not limited to, taxing districts, 24municipalities, land banks created pursuant to Illinois law, 25or non-profit developers focused on constructing affordable 26housing.   SB3908- 4 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    The assigned tax certificate shall be void with no further 2rights given to the assignee, including no right to refund or 3reimbursement, if a tax deed has not been recorded within 4 4years after the date of the assignment unless a court extends 5the assignment period as provided in this Section. Upon a 6motion by the assignee, a court may toll the 4-year deadline 7for a specified period of time if the court finds the assignee 8is prevented from obtaining or recording a deed by injunction 9or order of any court, by the refusal or inability of any court 10to act upon the application for a tax deed, by a municipality's 11refusal to issue necessary transfer stamps or approvals for 12recording, or by the refusal of the clerk to execute the deed. 13If an assigned tax certificate is void under this Section, it 14shall be forfeited to the county and held as a valid 15certificate of sale in the county's name pursuant to this 16Section 21-90. Upon such a forfeiture, the county shall pay 17all nonrefundable fees required under Section 22-100, 22-101, 1822-40, 22-80 unless previously paid by any certificate holder. 19The proceeds of any sale or assignment under this Section, 20less all costs of the county incurred in the acquisition, 21operation, maintenance, and sale of the property or assignment 22of the tax certificate, including all costs associated with 23county staff and overhead used to perform the duties of the 24trustee set forth in this Section, shall be distributed to the 25taxing districts in proportion to their respective interests 26therein.  SB3908- 5 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    Under Sections 21-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a 2county may bid or purchase only in the absence of other 3bidders.4(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    (35 ILCS 200/21-215)6    Sec. 21-215. Penalty bids. The person at the sale offering 7to pay the amount due on each property for the least penalty 8percentage shall be the purchaser of that property. If 9multiple bidders offer the least penalty percentage, the 10collector shall declare the winning purchaser randomly. No bid 11shall be accepted for a penalty exceeding 9% of the amount of 12the tax or special assessment on property.13(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22.) 14    (35 ILCS 200/21-295)15    Sec. 21-295. Creation of indemnity fund. 16    (a) In counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, each 17person purchasing any property at a sale under this Code shall 18pay to the County Collector, prior to the issuance of any 19certificate of purchase, a nonrefundable an indemnity fee set 20by the county collector of not more than $25 $20 for each item 21purchased. A like sum shall be paid for each year that all or a 22portion of subsequent taxes are paid by the tax purchaser and 23posted to the tax judgment, sale, redemption and forfeiture 24record where the underlying certificate of purchase is   SB3908- 6 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1recorded. 2    (a-5) In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, each 3person purchasing property at a sale under this Code shall pay 4to the County Collector a nonrefundable fee of $100 $80 for 5each item purchased plus an additional sum equal to 5% of the 6taxes, interest, and penalties paid under Section 21-240. In 7these counties, prior to expiration of the period of 8redemption, the certificate holder shall also pay to the 9County Collector a nonrefundable fee of $50 $80 for each year 10that all or a portion of subsequent taxes are paid by the tax 11purchaser and posted to the tax judgment, sale, redemption, 12and forfeiture record. Following expiration of the period of 13redemption, the certificate holder's payment of (i) any 14subsequent tax and special assessment and (ii) any redemption 15of any sale of subsequent taxes or forfeiture shall include a 16nonrefundable 10% indemnity fund fee paid by the petitioner. 17All fees received under this subsection shall be paid by the 18collector and the county clerk to the county treasurer of the 19county in which the land is situated for the purpose of funding 20the county's indemnity fund established by this Section. No 21fees incurred under this subsection shall be posted to the 22subject tax sale pursuant to Section 21-355. The changes to 23this subsection made by this amendatory Act of the 91st 24General Assembly are not a new enactment, but declaratory of 25existing law.26    (b) The amount paid prior to issuance of the certificate   SB3908- 7 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1of purchase pursuant to subsection (a) or (a-5) shall be 2included in the purchase price of the property in the 3certificate of purchase and all amounts paid under this 4Section shall be included in the amount required to redeem 5under Section 21-355, except for the nonrefundable $80 fee for 6each item purchased at the tax sale as provided in this 7Section. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of 8Section 21-300, all money received under subsection (a) or 9(a-5) shall be paid by the Collector to the County Treasurer of 10the County in which the land is situated, for the purpose of an 11indemnity fund. The County Treasurer, as trustee of that fund, 12shall invest all of that fund, principal and income, in his or 13her hands from time to time, if not immediately required for 14payments of indemnities under subsection (a) of Section 1521-305, in investments permitted by the Illinois State Board 16of Investment under Article 22A of the Illinois Pension Code. 17The county collector shall report annually to the county clerk 18on the condition and income of the fund. The indemnity fund 19shall be held to satisfy judgments obtained against the County 20Treasurer, as trustee of the fund. No payment shall be made 21from the fund, except upon a judgment of the court which 22ordered the issuance of a tax deed.23    (c) All indemnity fund fees under this Section shall be 24paid by all certificate holders, including any municipality, 25trustee, or county authority who acquires a certificate of 26purchase or forfeiture under any provision of this Code.   SB3908- 8 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1(Source: P.A. 100-1070, eff. 1-1-19; 101-659, eff. 3-23-21.) 2    (35 ILCS 200/21-305)3    Sec. 21-305. Payments from Indemnity Fund. 4    (a) Any owner of property sold under any provision of this 5Code who sustains loss or damage by reason of the issuance of a 6tax deed under Section 21-445 or 22-40 and who is barred or is 7in any way precluded from bringing an action for the recovery 8of the property shall have the right to indemnity for the loss 9or damage sustained, limited as follows: 10        (1) An owner who resided on property that contained 4 11    or less dwelling units on the last day of the period of 12    redemption and who is equitably entitled to compensation 13    for the loss or damage sustained has the right to 14    indemnity. An equitable indemnity award shall be limited 15    to the fair cash value of the property as of the date the 16    tax deed was issued less any mortgages or liens on the 17    property, and the award will not exceed $99,000. The Court 18    shall liberally construe this equitable entitlement 19    standard to provide compensation wherever, in the 20    discretion of the Court, the equities warrant the action. 21        An owner of a property that contained 4 or less 22    dwelling units who requests an award in excess of $99,000 23    must prove that the loss of his or her property was not 24    attributable to his or her own fault or negligence before 25    an award in excess of $99,000 will be granted.   SB3908- 9 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1        (2) An owner who sustains the loss or damage of any 2    property occasioned by reason of the issuance of a tax 3    deed, without fault or negligence of his or her own, has 4    the right to indemnity limited to the fair cash value of 5    the property less any mortgages or liens on the property. 6    In determining the existence of fault or negligence, the 7    court shall consider whether the owner exercised ordinary 8    reasonable diligence under all of the relevant 9    circumstances. 10        (3) In determining the fair cash value of property 11    less any mortgages or liens on the property, the fair cash 12    value shall be reduced by the principal amount of all 13    taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee 14    before the issuance of the tax deed. 15        (4) If an award made under paragraph (1) or (2) is 16    subject to a reduction by the amount of an outstanding 17    mortgage or lien on the property, other than the principal 18    amount of all taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her 19    assignee before the issuance of the tax deed and the 20    petitioner would be personally liable to the mortgagee or 21    lienholder for all or part of that reduction amount, the 22    court shall order an additional indemnity award to be paid 23    directly to the mortgagee or lienholder sufficient to 24    discharge the petitioner's personal liability. The court, 25    in its discretion, may order the joinder of the mortgagee 26    or lienholder as an additional party to the indemnity   SB3908- 10 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    action.2    (b) Indemnity fund; subrogation. 3        (1) Any person claiming indemnity hereunder shall 4    petition the Court which ordered the tax deed to issue, 5    shall name the County Treasurer, as Trustee of the 6    indemnity fund, as defendant to the petition, and shall 7    ask that judgment be entered against the County Treasurer, 8    as Trustee, in the amount of the indemnity sought. The 9    provisions of the Civil Practice Law shall apply to 10    proceedings under the petition, except that neither the 11    petitioner nor County Treasurer shall be entitled to trial 12    by jury on the issues presented in the petition. The Court 13    shall liberally construe this Section to provide 14    compensation wherever in the discretion of the Court the 15    equities warrant such action. 16        (2) The County Treasurer, as Trustee of the indemnity 17    fund, shall be subrogated to all parties in whose favor 18    judgment may be rendered against him or her, and by third 19    party complaint may bring in as a defendant any person, 20    other than the tax deed grantee and its successors in 21    title, not a party to the action who is or may be liable to 22    him or her, as subrogee, for all or part of the 23    petitioner's claim against him or her.24    (c) Any contract involving the proceeds of a judgment for 25indemnity under this Section, between the tax deed grantee or 26its successors in title and the indemnity petitioner or his or   SB3908- 11 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1her successors, shall be in writing. In any action brought 2under Section 21-305, the Collector shall be entitled to 3discovery regarding, but not limited to, the following: 4        (1) the identity of all persons beneficially 5    interested in the contract, directly or indirectly, 6    including at least the following information: the names 7    and addresses of any natural persons; the place of 8    incorporation of any corporation and the names and 9    addresses of its shareholders unless it is publicly held; 10    the names and addresses of all general and limited 11    partners of any partnership; the names and addresses of 12    all persons having an ownership interest in any entity 13    doing business under an assumed name, and the county in 14    which the assumed business name is registered; and the 15    nature and extent of the interest in the contract of each 16    person identified; 17        (2) the time period during which the contract was 18    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 19    direct or indirect contact between any of the contracting 20    parties to the date of its execution; 21        (3) the name and address of each natural person who 22    took part in negotiating the contract, and the identity 23    and relationship of the party that the person represented 24    in the negotiations; and 25        (4) the existence of an agreement for payment of 26    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party.  SB3908- 12 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    Any information disclosed during discovery may be subject 2to protective order as deemed appropriate by the court. The 3terms of the contract shall not be used as evidence of value.4    (d) A petition of indemnity under this Section must be 5filed within 10 years after the date the tax deed was issued.6    (e) No award under this Section shall be permitted if any 7person receives a judgment in their name under Sections 22-100 8and 22-101.9(Source: P.A. 97-557, eff. 7-1-12.) 10    (35 ILCS 200/21-355)11    Sec. 21-355. Amount of redemption. Any person desiring to 12redeem shall deposit an amount specified in this Section with 13the county clerk of the county in which the property is 14situated, in legal money of the United States, or by cashier's 15check, certified check, post office money order or money order 16issued by a financial institution insured by an agency or 17instrumentality of the United States, payable to the county 18clerk of the proper county. The deposit shall be deemed timely 19only if actually received in person at the county clerk's 20office prior to the close of business as defined in Section 213-2007 of the Counties Code on or before the expiration of the 22period of redemption or by United States mail with a post 23office cancellation mark dated not less than one day prior to 24the expiration of the period of redemption. The deposit shall 25be in an amount equal to the total of the following:  SB3908- 13 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1        (a) the certificate amount, which shall include all 2    tax principal, special assessments, interest and penalties 3    paid by the tax purchaser together with costs and fees of 4    sale and fees paid under Sections 21-295 and 21-315 5    through 21-335, except for any the nonrefundable fees $80 6    fee paid under Sections 22-100, 22-101, and pursuant to 7    Section 21-295, for each item purchased at the tax sale;8        (b) the accrued penalty, computed through the date of 9    redemption as a percentage of the certificate amount, as 10    follows:11            (1) if the redemption occurs on or before the 12        expiration of 6 months from the date of sale, the 13        certificate amount times the penalty bid at sale;14            (2) if the redemption occurs after 6 months from 15        the date of sale, and on or before the expiration of 12 16        months from the date of sale, the certificate amount 17        times 2 times the penalty bid at sale;18            (3) if the redemption occurs after 12 months from 19        the date of sale and on or before the expiration of 18 20        months from the date of sale, the certificate amount 21        times 3 times the penalty bid at sale;22            (4) if the redemption occurs after 18 months from 23        the date of sale and on or before the expiration of 24 24        months from the date of sale, the certificate amount 25        times 4 times the penalty bid at sale;26            (5) if the redemption occurs after 24 months from   SB3908- 14 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1        the date of sale and on or before the expiration of 30 2        months from the date of sale, the certificate amount 3        times 5 times the penalty bid at sale;4            (6) if the redemption occurs after 30 months from 5        the date of sale and on or before the expiration of 36 6        months from the date of sale, the certificate amount 7        times 6 times the penalty bid at sale.8        In the event that the property to be redeemed has been 9    purchased under Section 21-405 before January 1, 2024, the 10    penalty bid shall be 12% per penalty period as set forth in 11    subparagraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection (b). The 12    changes to this subdivision (b)(6) made by this amendatory 13    Act of the 91st General Assembly are not a new enactment, 14    but declaratory of existing law.15        For counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if 16    the property to be redeemed is property with respect to 17    which a tax lien or certificate is acquired after January 18    1, 2024 by the county as trustee pursuant to Section 19    21-90, the penalty bid at sale shall accrue according to 20    the penalty periods established in subparagraphs (1) 21    through (6) of this subsection (b). 22        For counties with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if 23    the property to be redeemed is property with respect to 24    which a tax lien or certificate is acquired on or after 25    January 1, 2024 by the county as trustee pursuant to 26    Section 21-90, the penalty bid is 0.75% and shall accrue   SB3908- 15 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    monthly instead of according to the penalty periods 2    established in subparagraphs (1) through (6) of this 3    subsection (b). 4        (c) The total of all taxes, special assessments, 5    accrued interest on those taxes and special assessments 6    and costs charged in connection with the payment of those 7    taxes or special assessments, except for any the 8    nonrefundable fees $80 fee paid, pursuant to Sections 9    22-100, 22-101, and Section 21-295, for each item 10    purchased at the tax sale, which have been paid by the tax 11    certificate holder on or after the date those taxes or 12    special assessments became delinquent together with 12% 13    penalty on each amount so paid for each year or portion 14    thereof intervening between the date of that payment and 15    the date of redemption. In counties with less than 16    3,000,000 inhabitants, however, a tax certificate holder 17    may not pay all or part of an installment of a subsequent 18    tax or special assessment for any year, nor shall any 19    tender of such a payment be accepted, until after the 20    second or final installment of the subsequent tax or 21    special assessment has become delinquent or until after 22    the holder of the certificate of purchase has filed a 23    petition for a tax deed under Section 22.30. The person 24    redeeming shall also pay the amount of interest charged on 25    the subsequent tax or special assessment and paid as a 26    penalty by the tax certificate holder. This amendatory Act   SB3908- 16 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    of 1995 applies to tax years beginning with the 1995 2    taxes, payable in 1996, and thereafter.3        (d) Any amount paid to redeem a forfeiture occurring 4    before January 1, 2024 but after the tax sale together 5    with 12% penalty thereon for each year or portion thereof 6    intervening between the date of the forfeiture redemption 7    and the date of redemption from the sale.8        (e) Any amount paid by the certificate holder for 9    redemption of a subsequently occurring tax sale, including 10    tax liens or certificates held by the county as trustee, 11    pursuant to Section 21-90, except for any nonrefundable 12    fees paid under Sections 22-100, 22-101, and 21-295.13        (f) All fees paid to the county clerk under Section 14    22-5.15        (g) All fees paid to the registrar of titles incident 16    to registering the tax certificate in compliance with the 17    Registered Titles (Torrens) Act.18        (h) All fees paid to the circuit clerk and the 19    sheriff, a licensed or registered private detective, or 20    the coroner in connection with the filing of the petition 21    for tax deed and service of notices under Sections 22-15 22    through 22-30 and 22-40 in addition to (1) a fee of $35 if 23    a petition for tax deed has been filed, which fee shall be 24    posted to the tax judgement, sale, redemption, and 25    forfeiture record, to be paid to the purchaser or his or 26    her assignee; (2) a fee of $4 if a notice under Section   SB3908- 17 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    22-5 has been filed, which fee shall be posted to the tax 2    judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record, to be 3    paid to the purchaser or his or her assignee; (3) all costs 4    paid to record a lis pendens notice in connection with 5    filing a petition under this Code; and (4) if a petition 6    for tax deed has been filed, all fees up to $150 per 7    redemption paid to a registered or licensed title 8    insurance company or title insurance agent for a title 9    search to identify all owners, parties interested, and 10    occupants of the property, to be paid to the purchaser or 11    his or her assignee. The fees in (1) and (2) of this 12    paragraph (h) shall be exempt from the posting 13    requirements of Section 21-360. The costs incurred in 14    causing notices to be served by a licensed or registered 15    private detective under Section 22-15, may not exceed the 16    amount that the sheriff would be authorized by law to 17    charge if those notices had been served by the sheriff.18        (i) All fees paid for publication of notice of the tax 19    sale in accordance with Section 22-20.20        (j) All sums paid to any county, city, village or 21    incorporated town for reimbursement under Section 22-35.22        (k) All costs and expenses of receivership under 23    Section 21-410, to the extent that these costs and 24    expenses exceed any income from the property in question, 25    if the costs and expenditures have been approved by the 26    court appointing the receiver and a certified copy of the   SB3908- 18 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    order or approval is filed and posted by the certificate 2    holder with the county clerk. Only actual costs expended 3    may be posted on the tax judgment, sale, redemption and 4    forfeiture record.5(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 6    (35 ILCS 200/22-40)7    Sec. 22-40. Issuance of deed; possession. 8    (a) To obtain an order for issuance of tax deed, 9subsequent to expiration of the period of redemption or any 10extended period of redemption, the certificate holder shall 11file with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which 12the land is situated an application for an order directing the 13county clerk to issue a tax deed and shall pay a $400 indemnity 14fund fee. All fees received under this subsection shall be 15paid by the circuit court of the county in which the land is 16situated to the county treasurer of the county in which the 17land is situated for the purpose of funding the county's 18indemnity fund established by Section 21-295. The the 19petitioner must provide sufficient evidence that:20        (1) the redemption period has expired and the property 21    has not been redeemed; 22        (2) all taxes and special assessments which became due 23    and payable subsequent to the sale have been paid, unless 24    the county or its agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 25    21-90, is the petitioner;   SB3908- 19 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1        (3) all forfeitures and sales which occur subsequent 2    to the sale are paid or redeemed, unless the county or its 3    agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 21-90, is the 4    petitioner; 5        (4) the notices required by law have been given, and 6    all advancements of public funds under the police power 7    made by a county, city, village, or town under Section 8    22-35 have been paid; and 9        (5) the petitioner has complied with all the 10    provisions of law entitling him or her to a deed; and .11        (6) the petitioner has proved to the satisfaction of 12    the court the name and last known address of the owner or 13    beneficial owner of record.14    Upon receipt of sufficient evidence of the requirements 15under this subsection (a), the court shall find that the 16petitioner complied with those requirements and proved to the 17satisfaction of the court the name and last known address of 18the owner or beneficial owner of the property ascertained 19through diligent inquiry and shall enter an order directing 20the county clerk, on the production of the tax certificate and 21a certified copy of the order, to issue to the purchaser or its 22assignee a tax deed. The court shall insist on strict 23compliance with Section 22-10 through 22-25. Prior to the 24entry of an order directing the issuance of a tax deed, the 25petitioner shall furnish the court with a report of 26proceedings of the evidence received on the application for   SB3908- 20 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1tax deed and the report of proceedings shall be filed and made 2a part of the court record.3    (b) Except as provided in subsection (e), if taxes for 4years prior to the year or years sold are or become delinquent 5subsequent to the date of sale, the court shall find that the 6lien of those delinquent taxes has been or will be merged into 7the tax deed grantee's title if the court determines that the 8tax deed grantee or any prior holder of the certificate of 9purchase, or any person or entity under common ownership or 10control with any such grantee or prior holder of the 11certificate of purchase, was at no time the holder of any 12certificate of purchase for the years sought to be merged. If 13delinquent taxes are merged into the tax deed pursuant to this 14subsection, the court shall enter an order declaring which 15specific taxes have been or will be merged into the tax deed 16title and directing the county treasurer and county clerk to 17reflect that declaration in the warrant and judgment records; 18provided, that no such order shall be effective until a tax 19deed has been issued and timely recorded. Nothing contained in 20this Section shall relieve any owner liable for delinquent 21property taxes under this Code from the payment of the taxes 22that have been merged into the title upon issuance of the tax 23deed.24    (c) The county clerk is entitled to a fee of $10 in 25counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $5 in counties 26with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants for the issuance of the   SB3908- 21 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1tax deed, with the exception of deeds issued to the county 2pursuant to its authority under Section 21-90. The clerk may 3not include in a tax deed more than one property as listed, 4assessed and sold in one description, except in cases where 5several properties are owned by one person. The fee paid to the 6county clerk for the issuance of the tax deed shall be 7accompanied by a receipt from the county treasurer as trustee 8of the indemnity fund proving payment of a nonrefundable 9$1,000 indemnity fund fee in counties of 3,000,000 or more 10inhabitants and a receipt from the county treasurer as trustee 11of the indemnity fund proving payment of a nonrefundable $200 12indemnity fund fee in counties with less than 3,000,000 13inhabitants. All fees received under this subsection shall be 14paid for the purpose of funding the county's indemnity fund 15established under Section 21-295. 16    (d) Upon application, the court shall enter an order to 17place the tax deed grantee or the grantee's successor in 18interest in possession of the property and may enter orders 19and grant relief as may be necessary or desirable to maintain 20the grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in 21possession.22    (e) (d) The court shall retain jurisdiction to enter 23orders pursuant to Section 22-100 and 22-101 and subsections 24(b) and (c) of this Section. Public Act 92-223 and Public Act 2595-477 shall be construed as being declarative of existing law 26and not as a new enactment.  SB3908- 22 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    (f) (e) Prior to the issuance of any tax deed under this 2Section, the petitioner must redeem all taxes and special 3assessments on the property that are subject to a pending tax 4petition filed by a county or its assignee pursuant to Section 521-90.6    (g) (f) If, for any reason, a purchaser fails to obtain an 7order for tax deed within the required time period and no sale 8in error was granted or redemption paid, then the certificate 9shall be forfeited to the county, as trustee, pursuant to 10Section 21-90.11    (h) Every order directing the county clerk to issue a tax 12deed shall contain the name and last known address of the owner 13or beneficial owner of the property. 14(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 15    (35 ILCS 200/22-55)16    Sec. 22-55. Tax deeds to convey merchantable title. This 17Section shall be liberally construed so that tax deeds shall 18convey merchantable title. In the event the property has been 19taken by eminent domain under the Eminent Domain Act, the tax 20purchaser shall be entitled to the award which is the 21substitute for the property. Tax deeds issued pursuant to this 22Section are subject to Section 22-70. Nothing in Section 2322-100 and Section 22-101 shall affect the merchantable title 24conveyed upon the recording of the tax deed. 25(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.)   SB3908- 23 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    (35 ILCS 200/22-60)2    Sec. 22-60. Contents of deed; recording; notice. 3    (a) Every tax deed shall contain the full names and the 4true post office address and residence of grantee. A county 5receiving a tax deed pursuant to Section 21-90 may designate a 6specific county agency to be named as the deed grantee. It 7shall not be of any force or effect, and the recipient shall 8not take title to the property, until after the deed has been 9recorded in the office of the recorder.10    (b) In order to be entitled to a tax deed, the tax deed 11grantee listed on the tax deed, including any county, trustee, 12land bank or municipality, shall deliver to the county clerk a 13notice to be given to the person or persons found to be the 14last known record owner or beneficial owner of the property in 15the order directing issuance of tax deed, in at least 10-point 16type in the following form completely filled in:17Notice of Tax Deed 18    I,....., County Clerk in and for said County, in the State 19of Illinois, do hereby certify that on, 20… I sent by certified 20mail postage prepaid, and by first class mail the following 21notice to the following parties, addressed as follows: Name of 22name of the owner or beneficial owner of the property listed in 23the 22-40(a) judgment;24    Address of the owner or beneficial owner of the property 25listed in the 22-40(a) judgment;  SB3908- 24 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    PLEASE TAKE NOTICE that tax deed number ..... was issued 2to..... pursuant to court order for the property identified by 3property index number ..... and commonly known as....., city, 4Illinois, in County, Illinois.5    Upon the tax deed being recorded pursuant to Section 622-60, all right, title, and interest to the property will be 7taken and title transferred to the named tax deed grantee.8    The record owner of the property or any beneficial owner 9of the property has 120 days from the date of this notice to 10apply for the Tax Deed Equity Fund payment pursuant to 11Sections 22-100 and 22-101. For more information, contact the 12county treasurer in which the property is located.13..... County Clerk 14....., County, Illinois 15Dated: ..... 16    (c) Upon receiving the order directing the county clerk to 17issue a tax deed, the notice provided in this Section, and the 18form tax deed, the county clerk shall stamp the date of receipt 19of the notice and shall within 7 days of receipt give notice by 20certified mail return receipt requested and first class mail 21to the last known record owner or beneficial owner listed in 22the notice received from the tax deed grantee;23    (d) The tax deed grantee shall record the stamped notice 24from the county clerk provided in this Section as an 25attachment to the tax deed. 26(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.)   SB3908- 25 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    (35 ILCS 200/22-65)2    Sec. 22-65. Form of deed. A tax deed executed by the county 3clerk under the official seal of the county shall be recorded 4in the same manner as other conveyances of property, and vests 5in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns, the title of the 6property therein described without further acknowledgment or 7evidence of the conveyance. Tax deeds issued under this 8Section shall not require prior to recording, municipal 9transfer or exemption stamps and shall not be subject to any 10municipal real estate transfer taxes, including any charges 11for water. The conveyance shall be substantially in the 12following form:13State of Illinois) 14                 ) ss. 15County of .......)16    At a public sale of property for the nonpayment of taxes, 17held in the county above stated, on (insert date), the 18following described property was sold: (here place description 19of property conveyed). The property not having been redeemed 20from the sale, and it appearing that the holder of the 21certificate of purchase of the property has complied with the 22laws of the State of Illinois necessary to entitle (insert 23him, her or them) to a deed of the property: I ...., county 24clerk of the county of ...., in consideration of the property 25and by virtue of the statutes of the State of Illinois in such   SB3908- 26 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1cases provided, grant and convey to ...., his or her heirs and 2assigns forever, the property described above.3    Dated (insert date).4Signature of .................. County Clerk5Seal of County of ...., Illinois6(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 7    (35 ILCS 200/22-80)8    Sec. 22-80. Order of court setting aside tax deed; 9payments to holder of deed.10    (a) Any order of court vacating an order directing the 11county clerk to issue a tax deed based upon a finding that the 12property was not subject to taxation or special assessment, or 13that the taxes or special assessments had been paid prior to 14the sale of the property, or that the tax sale was otherwise 15void, shall declare the tax sale to be a sale in error pursuant 16to Section 21-310 of this Act. The order shall direct the 17county collector to refund to the tax deed grantee or his or 18her successors and assigns (or, if a tax deed has not yet 19issued, the holder of the certificate) the following amounts: 20        (1) all taxes and special assessments purchased, paid, 21    or redeemed by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee, or 22    by the tax deed grantee or his or her successors and 23    assigns, whether before or after entry of the order for 24    tax deed, with interest at the rate of 1% per month from 25    the date each amount was paid until the date of payment   SB3908- 27 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    pursuant to this Section; 2        (2) all costs paid and posted to the judgment record 3    and not included in paragraph (1) of this subsection (a); 4    and 5        (3) court reporter fees for the hearing on the 6    application for tax deed and transcript thereof, the cost 7    of certification of tax deed order, the cost of issuance 8    of tax deed, and the cost of recording of tax deed.9    (b) Except in those cases described in subsection (a) of 10this Section, and unless the court on motion of the tax deed 11petitioner extends the redemption period to a date not later 12than 3 years from the date of sale, any order of court finding 13that an order directing the county clerk to issue a tax deed 14should be vacated shall direct the party who successfully 15contested the entry of the order to pay to the tax deed grantee 16or his or her successors and assigns (or, if a tax deed has not 17yet issued, the holder of the certificate) within 90 days 18after the date of the finding: 19        (1) the amount necessary to redeem the property from 20    the sale as of the last day of the period of redemption, 21    except that, if the sale is a scavenger sale pursuant to 22    Section 21-260 of this Act, the redemption amount shall 23    not include an amount equal to all delinquent taxes on 24    such property which taxes were delinquent at the time of 25    sale; and 26        (2) amounts in satisfaction of municipal liens paid by   SB3908- 28 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    the tax purchaser or his or her assignee, and the amounts 2    specified in paragraphs (1) and (3) of subsection (a) of 3    this Section, to the extent the amounts are not included 4    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (b).5        (3) if the tax deed grantee is a municipality, 6    trustee, or county authority, the amount necessary to 7    redeem the property from the sale as of the last day of the 8    period of redemption shall be paid to the county clerk in 9    satisfaction of the amounts due under this Section, except 10    that, if the sale is a scavenger sale pursuant to Section 11    21-260 of this Act, the redemption amount shall not 12    include an amount equal to all delinquent taxes on such 13    property which taxes were delinquent. 14        (4) If the payment is not made within the 90-day 15    period, the petition to vacate the order directing the 16    county clerk to issue a tax deed shall be denied with 17    prejudice, and the order directing the county clerk to 18    issue a tax deed shall remain in full force and effect. No 19    final order vacating any order directing the county clerk 20    to issue a tax deed shall be entered pursuant to this 21    subsection (b) until the payment has been made.22(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 23    (35 ILCS 200/22-100 new)24    Sec. 22-100. Tax Deed Equity Fund; collection by county 25treasurers.  SB3908- 29 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    (a) Each county treasurer shall transmit to the State 2Treasurer all Tax Deed Equity Fund payments paid to the county 3treasurer under this section and in the county treasurer's 4possession after each tax sale, with a report under oath 5identifying the total amount of property tax liens sold and 6the amount collected for the Tax Deed Equity Fund from each 7lien. Those amounts and the report shall be transmitted to and 8received by the State Treasurer by the 10th day after each tax 9sale and held in an interest bearing escrow account separate 10from all other accounts of any county. At the same time, a copy 11of the report shall be furnished to the Attorney General. The 12report shall be in a form and contain the particulars as the 13State Treasurer may prescribe. The State Treasurer shall give 14the county treasurer a receipt for the amount transmitted to 15the State Treasurer. Except as provided in subsection (a-5) of 16this Section, if any county treasurer fails to pay to the State 17Treasurer all amounts that may be due and payable as required 18by this Section, the county treasurer shall pay to the State 19Treasurer, as a penalty, a sum of money equal to the interest 20on the amounts not paid at the rate of 1% per month from the 21time those amounts are due by the county treasurer until those 22amounts are paid. The sureties upon the official bond of the 23county treasurer shall be security for the payment of the 24penalty. The penalty under this Section may be recovered in a 25civil action against the county treasurer and his or her 26sureties, in the name of the People of the State of Illinois,   SB3908- 30 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1in the circuit court of the county in which the county 2treasurer is resident; and the penalty, when recovered, shall 3be paid into the State treasury. The civil action to recover 4the penalty shall be brought by the State Treasurer within 10 5days after the failure of the county treasurer to pay to the 6State Treasurer any amounts collected by the county treasurer 7within the time required by this Section. Failure to bring the 8action within that time shall not prevent the bringing of the 9action thereafter. It is the duty of the State Treasurer to 10make necessary and proper investigation to determine what 11amounts should be paid under this Section.12    (b) The State Treasurer may waive penalties imposed by 13subsection (a) of this Section on a case-by-case basis if the 14State Treasurer finds that imposing penalties would be 15unreasonable or unnecessarily burdensome because the delay in 16payment was due to an incident caused by the operation of an 17extraordinary force, including, but not limited to, the 18occurrence of a natural disaster, that cannot be foreseen, 19that cannot be avoided by the exercise of due care, and for 20which no person can be held liable.21    (c) The total amount collected from the county treasurer 22shall be deposited into the Tax Deed Equity Fund, a special 23fund created in the State treasury.24    (d) Moneys in the Tax Deed Equity Fund shall be expended 25exclusively for the purpose of paying the amount ordered for 26equity surplus payments to Illinois property owners who have   SB3908- 31 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1lost their property by a recorded tax deed, except that, 2beginning no less than 2 years after the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, whenever the 4State Treasurer determines that any such moneys in the Tax 5Deed Equity Fund exceed the amount of payments ordered, the 6State Treasurer may transfer any such excess amounts from the 7Tax Deed Equity Fund to the county treasurer's indemnity fund 8equal to the percentage portion of the total amount paid into 9the Tax Deed Equity Fund on a per sale basis. The county 10treasurer shall make written request for payment from the Tax 11Deed Equity Fund pursuant to the court order on the 12application for equity fund payment as provided in this 13Section. The State Treasurer shall review and account for the 14Tax Deed Equity Fund and may adjust the payment requirements 15provided in section 22-101(f) and (g) from time to time as 16required to maintain sufficient and appropriate sums in the 17Tax Deed Equity Fund as necessary.18    (e) This Section shall constitute an irrevocable and 19continuing appropriation from Illinois tax lien purchases for 20the purpose of paying tax deed equity surplus payments to 21divested property owners whose property is conveyed by tax 22deed for the non-payment of real estate taxes upon the order of 23the Treasurer in accordance with the provisions of this 24Section and for the purpose of paying equity surplus to the 25divested property owner as required by the United States and 26Illinois constitutions.  SB3908- 32 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1    (f) In counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, each 2person purchasing any property at a sale under this Code shall 3pay to the county treasurer a nonrefundable Tax Deed Equity 4Fund fee equal to 10% of the total amount of each item 5purchased under Section 21-240. A like sum shall be paid for 6each year that all or a portion of subsequent taxes paid by the 7tax purchaser and posted to the sale. The 10% fee of the total 8certificate amount shall be paid by all certificate holders 9including any municipality, trustee, or county authority who 10acquire a certificate under Section 21-90.11    (g) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, each 12person purchasing property at a sale under this Code shall pay 13to the county treasurer a nonrefundable Tax Deed Equity Fund 14fee of $250 for each item purchased under Section 21-240. In 15these counties, the certificate holder shall also pay to the 16county treasurer a fee of $150 for each year that all or a 17portion of subsequent taxes are paid by the tax purchaser and 18posted to the sale. The $250 fee per certificate shall be paid 19by all certificate holders including any municipality, 20trustee, or county authority who acquire a certificate under 21Section 21-90.22    (h) The Tax Deed Equity Fund fees collected under (f) and 23(g) shall be collected, disbursed and accounted for as set 24forth in (a).25    (i) The amount paid prior to issuance of the certificate 26of purchase pursuant to subsection (f) and (g) shall be   SB3908- 33 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1included in the purchase price of the property in the 2certificate of purchase and shall not be included in the 3amount required to redeem under Section 21-355. All money 4received under subsection (b) or (c) shall be paid by the 5Collector to the county treasurer who shall transmit to the 6State Treasurer all such payments collected pursuant to 7Section 21-100. The changes made to this Section by this 8amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply to matters 9concerning tax certificates issued on or after the effective 10date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 11    (35 ILCS 200/22-101 new)12    Sec. 22-101. Application for Tax Deed Equity Fund Payment.13    (a) No payment shall be made from the Tax Deed Equity Fund, 14except on application to the Tax Deed Equity Fund and judgment 15as provided in this Section. Applications for Tax Deed Equity 16Fund payments may be filed with the county treasurer in which 17the land is situated at any time after the tax deed is recorded 18and for a period of no less than 120 days after the tax deed is 19recorded. The application shall be made in the following form, 20completely filled in and submitted on or before 120 days after 21the date the notice under subsection (b) of Section 22-60 is 22given to the last known record owner or beneficial owner of the 23property, to the county treasurer in which the property is 24located, along with a non-refundable application fee as 25designated by the applicable county treasurer:  SB3908- 34 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1APPLICATION FOR TAX DEED EQUITY FUND PAYMENT 2Name.........................................................3Address......................................................4City State Zip...............................................5Telephone No.................................................6Email Address................................................7Date of Application..........................................8    I,....., was the owner, beneficial owner, or possessed a 9property interest in the property commonly known as ....., 10identified by parcel/property index number ..... until a tax 11deed was recorded on .....(date) in ..... County, Illinois. A 12copy of the deed providing my ownership interest and the 13recorded tax deed are attached to this application.14    .....(initial here) I agree to the County Assessor's 15determination of the estimated fair market value of the 16property for the year in which the tax deed was recorded.17    .....(initial here) I do not agree to the County 18Assessor's determination of the estimated fair market value of 19the property for the year in which the tax deed was recorded 20and will provide within 30 days of this application an 21certified appraisal from an Illinois licensed appraiser 22stating the fair market value of the property lost to tax deed 23as of the date the tax deed was recorded.24    .....(initial here) I acknowledge that any contract 25involving the proceeds of a Tax Deed Equity Fund payment under 26this Section, between the tax deed grantee or its successors   SB3908- 35 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1in title and the Tax Deed Equity Fund claimant or his or her 2successors, shall be in writing. For any application brought 3under this Section, any contract involving the proceeds of the 4Tax Deed Equity Fund application shall be attached to the 5application and include the identity of all persons 6beneficially interested in the contract, directly or 7indirectly, including at least the following information:8        (1) the names and addresses of any natural persons; 9    the place of incorporation of any corporation and the 10    names and addresses of its shareholders unless it is 11    publicly held; the names and addresses of all general and 12    limited partners of any partnership;13        (2) the names and addresses of all persons having an 14    ownership interest in any entity doing business under an 15    assumed name, and the county in which the assumed business 16    name is registered; and the nature and extent of the 17    interest in the contract of each person identified;18        (3) the time period during which the contract was 19    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 20    direct contact between any of the contracting parties and 21    the date of its execution;22        (4) the name and address of each natural person who 23    took part in negotiating the contract between any 24    contracting parties to the date of its execution;25        (5) the existence of an agreement for the payment of 26    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party;  SB3908- 36 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1        (6) the terms of the contract shall not be used as 2    evidence of value.3    .....(initial here) I have not entered into a contract to 4assign any payment sought in this Application and understand 5that I am required to supplement my Application if a contract 6is entered into after submission of this Application or court 7order granting my application and directing payment from the 8Tax Deed Equity Fund.9    .....(initial here) I have entered into a contract to 10assign payment from the Tax Deed Equity Fund sought in this 11Application. A copy of the contract is attached to this 12Application.13    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Section 141-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the undersigned 15certifies that the statements in this instrument are true and 16correct.17Date: ..... Claimant Name.................................... 18            Claimant Signature............................... 19    (b) Upon receipt of the application, the county treasurer, 20through his or her counsel or designated agent, shall review 21the application and request any additional documents necessary 22from the claimant.23    Upon review of the application, and if approved, the 24county treasurer pursuant to Section 22-40(d) shall file an 25administrative application for Tax Deed Equity Fund Payment in 26the court that entered the order directing the county clerk to   SB3908- 37 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1issue a tax deed. The treasurer shall provide the total amount 2of taxes, penalties and interest paid by the tax deed grantee 3to obtain the tax deed including the costs of sale as provided 4by the county treasurer pursuant to the county records.5    (c) At the hearing, the court shall determine the Tax Deed 6Equity Fund award amount based on the claimant's application 7for Tax Deed Equity Surplus assessed or appraised value of the 8property or any county treasurer challenge thereto, less the 9total amount of taxes, penalties, and interest paid by the tax 10deed grantee to obtain the tax deed including the costs of sale 11as provided by the county treasurer pursuant to the county 12records. The property's surplus or excess value shall be paid 13pursuant to a judgment entered by the court. The property's 14surplus or excess value shall be the subject of the Tax Deed 15Equity Fund under Sections 22-100 and 22-101. No interest 16shall be paid for any payment ordered under this subsection.17    (d) Within 5 business days, the county treasurer shall 18transmit the order for payment to the State Treasurer for 19payment including the name and address of the person entitled 20to payment.21    (e) The county shall be allowed to pass an ordinance to 22charge an application fee of up to $100 per application for 23payment from the Tax Deed Equity Fund.24    (f) The divested property equity amount shall be 25calculated by the adjudicated amount of the fair market value 26of the property under subsection (c) of 22-100 at the time of   SB3908- 38 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1loss, less: (1) the principal amount of taxes paid to obtain 2the tax deed, including all statutory interest, fees and costs 3posted to the tax sale paid by the tax deed grantee; and (2) 4any taxes paid subsequent to the last day to redeem but prior 5to entry of the order directing the county clerk to issue a tax 6deed.7    (g) If any owner or claimant with a valid ownership 8interest in the property lost to tax deed files a petition to 9vacate the tax deed order pursuant to Section 2-1203 or 2-1401 10of the Code of Civil Procedure or seek a finding that the tax 11deed is otherwise void, the time from the date of filing 12through final judgment thereon shall be excluded from 13computation of the 120 days as provided in this Section.14    (h) Claimants seeking just compensation under this Section 15may recover attorney's fees for the purpose of encouraging 16settlement and prompt administrative handling of applications. 17The amount of attorney's fees on applications for Tax Deed 18Equity Fund payment that are undisputed by the county 19treasurer shall not exceed $500 in connection with the 20claimant's preparation, filing, or advancement of any 21application for equity fund payment unless there is a contract 22involving the proceeds of a Tax Deed Equity Fund payment 23between the tax deed grantee or its successors in title and the 24Tax Deed Equity Fund claimant or his or her successors.25    (i) The county clerk shall mark his or her official 26judgment and sale records for the tax deed issued with   SB3908- 39 -LRB104 19458 HLH 32906 b1notation of the total amount paid from the Tax Deed Equity Fund 2for the tax deed.3    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 4the 104th General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 5certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.